trunk/apertium-eu-es/apertium-eu-es.eu-es-adjgender.dix
    <pardef n="NP_IZE_ARR">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NP00000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPCN000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPCP000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPCS000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPFN000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPFP000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPFS000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPMN000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPMP000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPMS000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NP0000D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPCN00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPCP00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPCS00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPFN00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPFP00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPFS00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPMN00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPMP00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPMS00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NP0000A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPCN00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPCP00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPCS00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPFN00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPFP00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPFS00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPMN00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPMP00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPMS00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NP0000X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPCN00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPCP00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPCS00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPFN00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPFP00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPFS00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPMN00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPMP00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPMS00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>noKAT</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>Kanton</l> 
        <r>cantón</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NP_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ETA</l> 
        <r>eta</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NP_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>IRA</l> 
        <r>ira</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NP_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>Media</l> 
        <r>media</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NP_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>Pazko_uharte</l> 
        <r>pascua</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NP_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>José_izenaren_hipokoristikoa</l> 
        <r>pepe</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NP_IZE_ARR"/> 
    </e>
